Utah statutes.
56-3-2.   Disposal of human waste from passenger train prohibited.

No person operating or controlling any passenger train through or within this state may knowingly place, throw, release, discharge, or deposit human waste from a passenger train upon the right-of-way over which it operates.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 1989 General Session

